Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.510

Administrator may designate substitute for member of board, commission, etc.

When any officer, member, or employee of an agency abolished by provisions of this chapter is, under provisions of existing law, designated as a member ex officio of another board, commission, committee, or other agency, and no provision is made in this chapter with respect to a substitute, the administrator shall designate the officer or other person to serve hereafter in that capacity.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.30.210. Prior: 1957 c 38 s 21. Formerly RCW 43.30.210.]